Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.140.030

Authority of chapter—Supplemental.

The authority granted by this chapter is supplemental to any existing or future authority granted to the University of Washington and Washington State University and shall not be construed to limit the existing or future authority of these universities.

[ 2002 c 151 s 4.]